Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 10. Foreign Corporations.

Collateral references. —

Personal liability of stockholder, officer, or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state.
27 ALR4th 387.

Sec. 10.06.705.
Authorization of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in this state until it has been issued a certificate of authority by the commissioner. A foreign corporation may not be issued a certificate of authority to transact business in this state that a corporation organized under this chapter is not permitted to transact. A foreign corporation may not be denied a certificate of authority because the laws of the state or country under which it is organized governing its organization and internal affairs differ from the laws of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.710.
Liability for transacting business without certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation that transacts business in the state without a certificate of authority is liable to this state, for the years or portions of years during which it transacts business in the state without a certificate of authority, in an amount equal to all fees and corporation taxes that would have been imposed by this chapter on the corporation if it had applied for and received a certificate of authority to transact business in this state as required by this chapter and filed all reports required by this chapter, plus all penalties imposed by this chapter for failure to pay the fees and corporation taxes, plus a penalty of up to $10,000 per calendar year or portion of a calendar year for each year it transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority. The attorney general shall bring proceedings to recover amounts due the state under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.713.
Certificate of authority as prerequisite for court proceedings.

A foreign corporation transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority may not maintain an action, suit, or proceeding in a court of this state until it obtains a certificate of authority. A successor or assignee of a foreign corporation transacting business without a certificate of authority may not maintain an action, suit, or proceeding in a court of this state on a right, claim, or demand arising out of the transaction of business by the corporation in this state until a certificate of authority is obtained by the corporation or by a corporation that has acquired all or substanially all of its assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.715.
Transacting business without certificate of authority not affecting contracts and right to defend action.

The failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the corporation, and does not prevent the corporation from defending an action, suit, or proceeding in a court of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.718.
Activities not constituting transacting business in this state.

Without excluding other activities that may not constitute transacting business in this state, a foreign corporation is not considered to be transacting business in this state, for the purposes of this chapter, by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following activities:

maintaining, defending, or settling an action, suit, or administrative or arbitration proceeding, or the settlement of claims or disputes;

holding meetings of directors or shareholders of the corporation, or carrying on other activities concerning the internal affairs of the corporation;

maintaining bank accounts;

maintaining an office or agency for the transfer, exchange, and registration of securities of the corporation, or appointing and maintaining a trustee or depositary for the securities of the corporation;

making sales through independent contractors;

soliciting or procuring orders by mail, through employees, agents, or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside the state before becoming binding contracts;

creating, as borrower or lender, or acquiring indebtedness or mortgages or other security interests in real or personal property;

securing or collecting debts, or enforcing rights in property securing debts;

transacting business in interstate commerce;

conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of 30 days not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Opinions of attorney general. —

As long as the foreign insurance company maintains no agents or offices in Alaska and has no business with Alaska except that it purchases outside of Alaska deeds of trust on Alaska real property, it is not doing business in Alaska. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7. (Issued under prior law.)

Sec. 10.06.720.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

A certificate of authority may not be issued to a foreign corporation unless the corporate name of the corporation

contains the word “corporation”, “company”, “incorporated”, or “limited”, or an abbreviation of one of these words, or, for use in this state, adds at the end of its name one of these words or an abbreviation of one of them;

does not contain a word or phrase that indicates or implies that it is organized for a purpose other than the purpose contained in its articles of incorporation or that it is authorized or empowered to conduct the business of banking or insurance;

does not contain the word “city”, “borough”, or “village” or otherwise imply that the corporation is a municipality, but the name of a city, borough, or village may be used in the corporate name;

is available for corporate use under AS

10.06.105(d)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendments to this section made by § 9, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, §§ 150 – 156.

Right to protection of corporate name, as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state. 26 ALR3d 994.

Sec. 10.06.723.
Assumed corporate name.

If a foreign corporation applying for a certificate of authority has a name that is impermissible under any provision of AS

10.06.720

, it shall select an assumed name, acceptable under the provisions of AS

10.06.720

, under which it elects to do business in this state.

The commissioner shall maintain records that cross-reference the actual and assumed names of all foreign corporations authorized to transact business in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.725.
Change of name by foreign corporation.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state changes its name to one under which a certificate of authority would not be granted to it, the certificate of authority of the corporation is suspended and it may not transact business in this state until it has changed its name to a name available to it under the laws of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.728.
Application for certificate of authority.

To receive a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, a foreign corporation shall apply to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.730.
Contents of application.

The application must set out

the name of the corporation and the assumed name, if any, or if the name of the corporation does not contain the word “corporation”, “company”, “incorporated”, or “limited” or an abbreviation of one of these words, the name of the corporation with the word or abbreviation that it elects to use in this state; and the state or country under whose laws it is incorporated;

the date of incorporation and the period of duration of the corporation;

the address of the principal office of the corporation in the state or country under whose laws it is incorporated;

the address of the proposed registered office of the corporation in this state, and the name of its proposed registered agent in this state at that address;

the purpose the corporation proposes to pursue in the transaction of business in this state and the codes from the identification code established under AS

10.06.870

that most closely describe the activities in which the corporation will engage in this state;

the names and addresses of the directors and officers of the corporation;

a statement of the aggregate number of shares that the corporation may issue, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value, and series, if any, within a class;

a statement of the aggregate number of issued shares itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value, and series, if any, within a class;

a statement expressed in dollars of the amount of stated capital of the corporation;

an estimate expressed in dollars of the

value of all property to be owned by the corporation for the following year;

value of the property of the corporation to be located in this state during the following year;

gross amount of all business that will be transacted by the corporation during the following year; and

gross amount of business that will be transacted by the corporation at or from places of business in this state during the following year;

additional information necessary or appropriate to enable the commissioner to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a certificate of authority and to determine and assess the fees and taxes prescribed in this chapter that are payable;

the name and address of each alien affiliate, the percentage of outstanding shares controlled by each alien affiliate, and a specific description of the nature of the relationship between the foreign corporation and its alien affiliate; or, a statement that there are no alien affiliates;

the name and address of each person owning at least five percent of the shares, or five percent of any class of shares, and the percentage of the shares or class of shares owned by that person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.733.
Forms for, and execution and filing of application for certificate of authority.

The application of the corporation for a certificate of authority shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the commissioner. The application shall be executed by the president or vice-president of the corporation and by its secretary or an assistant secretary. The original application and an exact copy of it shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

and for issuance of a certificate of authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 16 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.735.
Effect of certificate of authority.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of authority by the commissioner, the corporation may transact business in this state for the purpose set out in its application, subject, however, to the right of this state to suspend or revoke the authority as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.738.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall obtain an amended certificate of authority if it changes its corporate name, or desires to pursue in this state other or additional purposes than those set out in its earlier application for a certificate of authority.

The requirements for the form and contents of an application for an amended certificate of authority, the manner of its execution, the filing of the original application and an exact copy of it with the commissioner, and the issuance and effect of an amended certificate of authority shall be the same as in the case of an original application for a certificate of authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.740.
Status of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation that has received a certificate of authority enjoys, until a certificate of revocation or of withdrawal has been issued as provided in this chapter, the same, but no greater, rights and privileges as a domestic corporation organized for the purposes set out in the application under which the certificate of authority is issued and, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, is subject to the duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or hereafter imposed upon a domestic corporation of like character.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.743.
Revocation of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state may be revoked by the commissioner when

the corporation fails to file its biennial report within the time required by this chapter, or fails to pay fees, corporation taxes, or penalties prescribed in this chapter when they are due and payable;

the corporation fails to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state;

the corporation fails, after change of its registered office or registered agent, to file with the commissioner a statement of the change as required by this chapter;

the corporation fails to file with the department an amendment to its articles of merger within the time prescribed by this chapter;

a misrepresentation of a material matter has been made in an application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted under this chapter; or

the corporation is a party to an illegal combination in restraint of trade.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.745.
Limitations on revocation of certificate of authority.

The commissioner may not revoke a certificate of authority of a foreign corporation unless the

commissioner has given the corporation at least 60 days notice by certified mail addressed to its registered office in this state; and

corporation fails before revocation to file the biennial report, or pay the fees, corporation taxes, or penalties, or file the required statement of change of registered agent or registered office, or file the articles of merger, or correct the misrepresentation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.748.
Issuance of certificate of revocation.

Upon revoking a certificate of authority, the commissioner shall

issue a certificate of revocation in duplicate;

file one of the certificates in the commissioner’s office; and

mail one of the certificates of revocation to the corporation at its registered office in this state under AS

10.06.753

(1).

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.750.
Effect of certificate of revocation.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of revocation, the authority of the corporation to transact business in this state ceases.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.753.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall have and continuously maintain in the state a registered

office that may be, but need not be, the same as its place of business in this state; and

agent, who may be either an individual resident in this state whose business office is identical to the registered office, or a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, that has a business office identical to the registered office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.758.
Change of registered office or registered agent of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may change its registered office or change its registered agent, or both, upon filing with the commissioner a statement setting out

the name of the corporation;

the address of its registered office;

the address of the new registered office if the address of its registered office is to be changed;

the name of its registered agent;

the name of its new registered agent if its registered agent is to be changed;

that the address of its registered office and the address of the business office of its registered agent, as changed, will be identical; and

that the change is authorized by resolution adopted by the board of directors.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.760.
Filing of statement of change.

A statement of change under AS

10.06.758

shall be executed by the corporation by its president or a vice-president and delivered to the commissioner. If the commissioner finds that the statement conforms to the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner shall file the statement in the office of the commissioner and, upon the filing, the change of address of the registered office, or the appointment of a new registered agent, or both, as the case may be, becomes effective.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.763.
Service on foreign corporation.

The registered agent appointed by a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall be an agent of the corporation upon whom process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Collateral references. —

36
Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, § 476 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, §§ 989, 1030 et seq.

Power of state to subject foreign corporation to jurisdiction of its court on sole ground that corporation committed tort within state. 25 ALR2d 1202.

Who is “general” or “managing” agent of foreign corporation under statute authorizing service of process on such agent. 17 ALR3d 625.

Sec. 10.06.765.
Service on commissioner.

When a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, or not authorized to transact business in this state but doing so, fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or when a registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, or when the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation is suspended or revoked, the commissioner is an agent upon whom process, notice, or demand may be served. Service is made upon the commissioner as provided in AS

10.06.175(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.768.
Records kept by commissioner.

The commissioner shall keep a record of all processes, notices, or demands served upon the commissioner under AS

10.06.765

and shall record the time of service and action taken by the commissioner with reference to the service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.770.
Procedure not exclusive.

AS

10.06.763

—

10.06.768

do not limit or affect the right to serve a process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.775.
Organic change of foreign corporation.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state is a party to an organic change permitted by the laws of the state or country where it is incorporated, and the corporation is the surviving corporation, it shall, within 30 days after the change becomes effective, file with the commissioner a copy of the articles of merger, consolidation, exchange, or reorganization authenticated by the proper office of the state or country under whose laws the organic change was carried out. It is not necessary for the corporation to obtain a new or amended certificate of authority to transact business in this state unless the name of the corporation is changed or unless the corporation desires to pursue in this state other or additional purposes than those that it is authorized to transact in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.778.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may withdraw from this state upon obtaining from the commissioner a certificate of withdrawal. To obtain a certificate of withdrawal, the foreign corporation shall deliver to the commissioner an application for withdrawal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.780.
Contents of application for withdrawal.

An application for withdrawal must set out

the name of the corporation and the state or country where it is incorporated;

that the corporation is not transacting business in this state;

that the corporation surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

that the corporation revokes the authority of its registered agent in this state to accept service of process and consents that service of process in an action, suit, or proceeding based upon a cause of action arising in this state during the time the corporation was authorized to transact business in this state may be made on the corporation by service on the commissioner;

a post office address to which the commissioner may mail a copy of a process against the corporation that may be served on the commissioner;

a statement of the aggregate number of shares that the corporation may issue, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value, and series, if any, within a class, as of the date of the application;

a statement of the aggregate number of issued shares, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value, and series, if any, within a class, as of the date of the application;

a statement, expressed in dollars, of the amount of stated capital of the corporation, as of the date of the application;

additional information necessary or appropriate to enable the commissioner to determine and assess unpaid fees or corporate taxes payable as prescribed in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.783.
Form and execution of application for withdrawal.

An application for withdrawal shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the commissioner and shall be executed by the corporation by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary, or, if the corporation is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, the application shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by the receiver or trustee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.785.
Filing of application for withdrawal.

An original and an exact copy of an application for withdrawal shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

and for issuance of a certificate of withdrawal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.788.
Effect of certificate of withdrawal.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of withdrawal, the authority of a corporation to transact business in this state ceases.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)